Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB67.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 65-1158 is hereby amended to read as follows:
65-1158. (a) Upon the order of a physician or dentist requesting
anesthesia or analgesia care, each registered nurse anesthetist shall be
authorized to:
(1) Conduct a pre- and post-anesthesia and pre- and post-analgesia
visit and assessment with appropriate documentation;
(2) develop a general plan of anesthesia care with the physician or
dentist;
(3) select the method for administration of anesthesia or analgesia;
(4) select or administer appropriate medications and anesthetic
agents during the peri-anesthetic or peri-analgesic period;
(5) order necessary medications and tests in the peri-anesthetic or
peri-analgesic period;
(6) induce and maintain anesthesia or analgesia at the required
levels;
(7) support life functions during the peri-anesthetic or peri-
analgesic period;
(8) recognize and take appropriate action with respect to patient
responses during the peri-anesthetic or peri-analgesic period;
(9) manage the patient's emergence from anesthesia or analgesia;
and
(10) participate in the life support of the patient.
(b) (1) A registered nurse anesthetist may prescribe durable
medical equipment and prescribe, procure and administer any drug
consistent with the registered nurse anesthetist's education and
qualifications. Except as permitted by subsection (a), a registered
nurse anesthetist shall not prescribe, procure or administer any
anesthetic agent. Any drug that is a controlled substance shall be
prescribed, procured or administered in accordance with the uniform
controlled substance act.
(2) A registered nurse anesthetist shall not perform or induce an
abortion or prescribe, procure or administer drugs for an abortion.
(3) A prescription order shall include the name, address and
telephone number of the registered nurse anesthetist. A registered nurse
anesthetist shall not dispense drugs but may request, receive and sign
for professional samples and may distribute professional samples to
patients.
(4) In order to prescribe controlled substances, a registered nurse
anesthetist shall:
(A) Register with the federal drug enforcement administration;
and
(B) comply with federal drug enforcement administration
requirements related to controlled substances.
(c) Each registered nurse anesthetist may participate in periodic
and joint evaluation of services rendered, including, but not limited to,
chart reviews, case reviews, patient evaluation and outcome of case
statistics.
(c)(d) A registered nurse anesthetist shall perform duties and
functions in an interdependent role as a member of a physician or
dentist directed health care healthcare team.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 65-1158 is hereby repealed.

Substitute for SENATE BILL No. 67—page 2
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.